Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.092

Program for military personnel—Restrictions as to high school completion program.

The state board for community and technical colleges may authorize any board of trustees to do all things necessary to conduct an education, training, and service program authorized by chapter 28B.50 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, for United States military personnel and their dependents, and department of defense civilians and their dependents, at any geographical location: PROVIDED, That such programs shall be limited to those colleges which conducted programs for United States military personnel prior to January 1, 1977: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any high school completion program conducted pursuant to this section shall comply with standards set forth in rules and regulations promulgated by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the superintendent of public instruction shall issue the certificate or diploma in recognition of high school completion education provided pursuant to this section.

[ 1991 c 238 s 34; 1977 ex.s. c 131 s 1; 1973 c 105 s 1.]